apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="fluers__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="helt__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="republik__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ker</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="uge__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rs</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="time__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rs</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="side__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rs</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="agenter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fisk__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ejendomme__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tank__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="krig__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sol__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gang__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>appelsiner</l>
          <r>appelsin</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>badebukser</i>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bananer</l>
          <r>banan</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bekendte</l>
          <r>bekendt</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bogstaver</l>
          <r>bogstav</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ceremonier</l>
          <r>ceremoni</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>distrikter</l>
          <r>distrikt</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejendomme</l>
          <r>ejendom</r>
        </p>
        <par n="ejendomme__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>erhverv</i>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fisk</i>
        <par n="fisk__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fliser</l>
          <r>flise</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fluers</l>
          <r>flue</r>
        </p>
        <par n="fluers__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>gang</i>
        <par n="gang__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gardiner</l>
          <r>gardin</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>grad</i>
        <par n="grad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>helt</i>
        <par n="helt__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>heste</l>
          <r>hest</r>
        </p>
        <par n="ejendomme__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hjul</i>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hytter</l>
          <r>hytte</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>japaner</i>
        <par n="helt__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kahytter</l>
          <r>kahyt</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kløer</l>
          <r>klo</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>knogler</l>
          <r>knogle</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kontorister</l>
          <r>kontorist</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>krig</i>
        <par n="krig__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lamper</l>
          <r>lampe</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>linser</l>
          <r>linse</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mineraler</l>
          <r>mineral</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>musikere</l>
          <r>musiker</r>
        </p>
        <par n="ejendomme__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>paraplyer</l>
          <r>paraply</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>republik</i>
        <par n="republik__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ribben</i>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>shorts</i>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>side</i>
        <par n="side__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>slags</i>
        <par n="fisk__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sokker</l>
          <r>sok</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sol</i>
        <par n="sol__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>svagheder</l>
          <r>svaghed</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tank</i>
        <par n="tank__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>temperaturer</l>
          <r>temperatur</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>time</i>
        <par n="time__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uenigheder</l>
          <r>uenighed</r>
        </p>
        <par n="agenter__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>uge</i>
        <par n="uge__n"/>
      </e>
